District of Columbia statutes.
47-355.08

Notice requirement.

Within 30 days of the effective date of this subchapter [April 4, 2003], the Mayor shall issue an administrative order advising all District agency heads, deputy agency heads, chief financial officers, agency budget directors, agency controllers, and other managers of the requirement of this subchapter.

Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-285, § 2, 50 DCR 940
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 77(a), 51 DCR 881
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.